Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5576.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 82.02 RCW to read as follows:(1)(a) The legislative body of a county, city, or town may impose a special excise tax on the sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging of short-term rentals subject to tax under chapter 82.08 RCW, as provided in this section.(b) The tax under this section applies exclusively to the sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging of short-term rentals facilitated through a short-term rental platform.(c) The rate of tax under this section is imposed on the sale of, or charge made for, the furnishing of lodging of a short-term rental subject to tax under chapter 82.08 RCW. The rate of tax may not exceed four percent on the sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging of short-term rentals. The rate of tax under this section must not be imposed in increments of less than one percent. The department shall perform the collection of the tax on behalf of a county, city, or town imposing the tax at no cost to the county, city, or town.(d) Any county ordinance or resolution adopted under this section must contain a provision allowing a credit against the county tax for the full amount of any city or town tax imposed under this section upon the same taxable event. The legislative authority of any county or any city may impose the tax authorized in this section throughout the county for the county tax and in the corporate limits of the city for the city tax.(e) Proceeds from the tax must be deposited in the essential affordable housing local assistance account created in subsection (5) of this section. The department must make deposits into the account on a monthly basis on the last business day of the month in which distributions required in subsection (5)(b)(i) of this section are due.(2)(a) The legislative body of a county, city, or town must adopt a resolution of intent to adopt legislation authorizing the tax under this section before imposing the tax under this section.(b) Adoption of the resolution of intent and legislation requires simple majority approval of the enacting legislative authority. (3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, moneys collected from the special excise tax under this section must be deposited into a separate fund to be used exclusively for the following purposes:(i) Acquiring, rehabilitating, or constructing affordable or workforce housing, which may include new units of affordable housing within an existing structure, or facilities providing supportive housing services;(ii) Funding the operations and maintenance costs of units of affordable, workforce, or supportive housing;(iii) Providing rental assistance to tenants; or(iv) Funding the operations of social service organizations and nonprofit organizations dedicated to providing services and assistance related to attaining and maintaining housing including, but not limited to, employment assistance, utilities assistance, nutritional assistance, and child care assistance.(b) A county, city, or town may retain up to 15 percent of the moneys collected under this section in each calendar year for the direct and indirect costs incurred in the administration of services and programs as provided in (a) of this subsection.(c) A county, city, or town imposing the tax authorized under this section may enter into an interlocal agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW with another county, city, or town, to jointly undertake projects satisfying the requirements of (b) of this subsection.(4) Beginning the year after the special excise tax authorized in this section is first collected, a county, city, or town imposing the tax must publish an annual report by March 1st of each year detailing how the revenue from the tax was spent in the prior year. The report must be made available to the public. This may include posting the report on the county's, city's, or town's website.(5)(a) The essential affordable housing local assistance account is hereby created in the state treasury. All proceeds from the tax authorized under this section must be deposited into the account.(b) Moneys in the essential affordable housing local assistance account may be withdrawn only for:(i) Distributions to counties, cities, and towns on a monthly basis; and(ii) Making refunds of taxes imposed under the authority of this section.(6) A city, town, or county may not impose the tax authorized under this section before April 1, 2026.(7) All administrative provisions in chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.32 RCW, insofar as they are applicable, apply to the local option tax authorized under this section.(8) For the purposes of this section:(a) "Operator" has the same meaning as in RCW 64.37.010.(b) "Short-term rental" and "short-term rental platform" have the same meanings as in RCW 64.37.010.Sec. 2. RCW 67.28.181 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 24 s 703 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The legislative body of any municipality may impose an excise tax on the sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging that is subject to tax under chapter 82.08 RCW. The rate of tax shall not exceed the lesser of two percent or a rate that, when combined with all other taxes imposed upon sales of lodging within the municipality under this chapter and chapters 36.100, ((67.40,)) 82.08, and 82.14 RCW, equals twelve percent. A tax under this chapter shall not be imposed in increments smaller than tenths of a percent.(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section:(a) If a municipality was authorized to impose taxes under this chapter or RCW 67.40.100 or both with a total rate exceeding four percent before July 27, 1997, such total authorization shall continue through January 31, 1999, and thereafter the municipality may impose a tax under this section at a rate not exceeding the rate actually imposed by the municipality on January 31, 1999.(b) If a city or town, other than a municipality imposing a tax under (a) of this subsection, is located in a county that imposed taxes under this chapter with a total rate of four percent or more on January 1, 1997, the city or town may not impose a tax under this section.(c) If a city has a population of ((four hundred thousand))400,000 or more and is located in a county with a population of ((one million))1,000,000 or more, the rate of tax imposed under this chapter by the city shall not exceed the lesser of four percent or a rate that, when combined with all other taxes imposed upon sales of lodging in the municipality under this chapter and chapters 36.100, ((67.40,)) 82.08, and 82.14 RCW, equals ((fifteen and two-tenths))15.2 percent.(d) If a municipality was authorized to impose taxes under this chapter or RCW 67.40.100, or both, at a rate equal to six percent before January 1, 1998, the municipality may impose a tax under this section at a rate not exceeding the rate actually imposed by the municipality on January 1, 1998.(3) Any county ordinance or resolution adopted under this section shall contain a provision allowing a credit against the county tax for the full amount of any city or town tax imposed under this section upon the same taxable event.(4) In determining the effective combined rate of tax for purposes of the limit in subsections (1) and (2)(c) of this section, the tax rates under RCW 82.14.530 ((is))and section 1 of this act are not included.Sec. 3. RCW 82.14.410 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 24 s 704 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A local sales and use tax change adopted after December 1, 2000, must provide an exemption for those sales of lodging for which, but for the exemption, the total sales tax rate imposed on sales of lodging would exceed the greater of:(a) Twelve percent; or(b) The total sales tax rate that would have applied to the sale of lodging if the sale were made on December 1, 2000.(2) For the purposes of this section:(a) "Local sales and use tax change" is defined as provided in RCW 82.14.055.(b) "Sale of lodging" means the sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging and all other services by a hotel, rooming house, tourist court, motel, trailer camp, and the granting of any similar license to use real property.(c) "Total sales tax rate" means the combined rates of all state and local taxes imposed under this chapter and chapters 36.100, 67.28, ((67.40,)) and 82.08 RCW, and any other tax authorized after March 29, 2001, if the tax is in the nature of a sales tax collected from the buyer, but excluding taxes imposed under RCW 81.104.170 before December 1, 2000, ((and)) taxes imposed under RCW 82.14.530, and taxes imposed under section 1 of this act.--- END ---